Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 6. Sales Other Than Consumer Credit Sales

§ 40-14-256.
Sales subject to provisions by agreement of parties.

The parties to a sale other than a consumer credit sale may agree in a writing signed by the parties that the sale is subject to the provisions of this act applying to consumer credit sales. If the parties so agree the sale is a consumer credit sale for the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-601; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-601.

Cross references. —

For definition of “consumer credit sale,” see § 40-14-204(b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes Truth in Lending Act violation which “was not intentional and resulted from bona fide error notwithstanding maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such error” within meaning of § 130(c) of Act (15 USC § 1640(c)) 153 ALR Fed 193.

§ 40-14-257.
Definition. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-602; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-602; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1; 1996, ch. 86, § 2; 2013 ch. 124, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-258.
Applicability of other provisions to consumer related sales. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-603; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-603; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-259.
Limitation on default charges in consumer related sales. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-604; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-604; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-260.
Credit service charge for other sales. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-605; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-605; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.